Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Toll Bridges [Repealed]

54-13-201. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1258 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 52, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 1722; Code 1932, § 3048; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1702; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-202. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1260 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 5); Shan., § 1724; Code 1932, § 3050; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1704; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-203. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1262 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 5; 1835-1836, ch. 52, § 3); Shan., § 1726; Code 1932, § 3052; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1706; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-204. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1263 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 52, § 3); Shan., § 1727; Code 1932, § 3053; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1707; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-205. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1264 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 7); Shan., § 1728; Code 1932, § 3054; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1708; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-206. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1265 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, §§ 1, 6; 1835-1836, ch. 52, § 4); Shan., § 1729; Code 1932, § 3055; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1709; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-207. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1272 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 8); Shan., § 1736; Code 1932, § 3062; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1710; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-208. [Repealed.]

Acts 1885, ch. 124, § 1; Shan., § 2121; mod. Code 1932, § 3779; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1801; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-209. [Repealed.]

Acts 1885, ch. 124, § 1; Shan., § 2126; Code 1932, § 3783; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1802; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-210. [Repealed.]

Acts 1885, ch. 124, § 1; Shan., § 2122; Code 1932, § 3780; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1803; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-211. [Repealed.]

Acts 1885, ch. 124, § 1; Shan., § 2123; mod. Code 1932, § 3781; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1804; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.

54-13-212. [Repealed.]

Acts 1885, ch. 124, § 1; Shan., § 2124; Code 1932, § 3782; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1805; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-13-201 — 54-13-212, concerned toll bridges.